District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.143

Payment In Lieu of Taxes Act not to apply.

D.C. Law 17-252 shall apply notwithstanding the provisions of Part E of subchapter IV of Chapter 3 of Title 1.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-252, § 113, 55 DCR 9251